en: lemon verbena
fr: verveine citronnee, verveine citronelle
hr: limunska verbena
it: verbena citriodora
la: Aloysia citrodora, lippia citriodora
nl: citroenverbena

en: hemp
fr: chanvre
hr: konoplje
nl: hennep

en: hemp flour
fr: farine de chanvre
hr: konopljino brašno
it: farina di canapa
nl: hennepmeel

en: aromatic leaf
de: aromatisches Blatt
es: hoja aromática
fr: feuille aromatique
hr: aromatični list
it: foglia aromatica
nl: aromatisch blad

en: blackberry leaf, blackberry leaves
bg: лист къпина
fr: feuilles de mûre
hr: list kupine
it: foglia di mora
nl: braamblad, braambladeren

en: parsley root
cs: kořenová petržel
da: persillerod
de: Petersilienwurzel, Wurzelpetersilie
eo: radikpetroselo
es: raices de peregril
fr: racine de persil
hr: korijen peršina
it: radice di prezzemolo
la: Petroselinum crispum subsp. tuberosum, Petroselinum crispum var. tuberosum
nb: persillerot
nl: peterseliewortel, wortelpeterselie
pl: korzeń pietruszki, pietruszka korzeń
ru: петрушка корневая
sl: jeva korenina
sr: koren peršuna

en: Achillea millefolium
ar: قيصوم ألفي الأوراق
az: Adi boymadərən
ba: Меңъяпраҡ
be: Крываўнік лекавы
bg: Бял равнец
bs: Hajdučka trava
ca: Milfulles
cs: Řebříček obecný
cy: Milddail
da: Almindelig røllike
de: Gemeine Schafgarbe
el: Αγριαψιθιά
eo: Milfolia akileo
es: Achillea millefolium
et: Harilik raudrohi
eu: Milorri
fa: بومادران معمولی
fi: Siankärsämö
fr: Achillée millefeuille
gl: Milfollas
gv: Ayr lossey
he: אכילאה אלף העלה
hr: obični stolisnik
hu: Közönséges cickafark
hy: Հազարատերևուկ սովորական
id: Daun seribu
io: Akileo
is: Vallhumall
it: Achillea millefolium
ja: セイヨウノコギリソウ
kk: Кәдімгі мыңжапырақ
ko: 서양톱풀
ku: Gêjînk
la: Achillea millefolium
lt: Paprastoji kraujažolė
lv: Pelašķis
mk: Ајдучка трева
nl: Duizendblad (soort)
nn: Ryllik
oc: Milafuèlhas
pl: Krwawnik pospolity
pt: Milefólio
ro: Coada șoricelului
ru: Тысячелистник обыкновенный
sh: Hajdučka trava
sk: Rebríček obyčajný
sl: Navadni rman
sr: Хајдучка трава
sv: Röllika
tl: Achillea millefolium
tr: Civanperçemi
uk: Деревій звичайний
ur: اَلفیہ
uz: Boʻyimodaron
vi: Vạn diệp
zh: 歐蓍草

en: basil
af: Basilie
am: በሶብላ
ar: ريحان
az: Adi reyhan
ba: Райхан
be: Базілік
bg: босилек
bs: Bosiljak
ca: alfàbrega
cs: bazalka, bazalka pravá
cy: Brenhinllys
da: basilikum
de: Basilikum
dv: ގަނދަކޯޅި
el: Βασιλικός
eo: Bazilio
es: albahaca
et: basiilik
eu: Albaka
fa: ریحان
fi: basilika, basilikaa, maustebasilika
fr: basilic
gl: Asubiote
gn: Albahaca
gu: તકમરિયાં
gv: Bassyl
ha: Ɗaɗɗoya
he: ריחן מצוי
hr: bosiljak, bosil jak
ht: Bazilik
hu: Bazsalikom
hy: Ռեհան
id: Selasih
io: Bazilo
is: Basilíka
it: basilico
ja: バジリコ, バジル
jv: Selasih
ka: ბოსტნის რეჰანი
kk: Базилик
kn: ತುಳಸಿ
ko: 바질
ku: Rihan
la: Ocimum basilicum
lb: Basilic
lt: Kvapusis bazilikas, bazilikų
lv: Baziliks
mk: Босилек
mr: तुळस
ms: Pokok Selasih
my: ပင်စိမ်းမွှေး
nb: basilikum
ne: बाबरी
nl: basilicum
nn: basilikum
oc: Basèli
om: Massobila
pa: ریحان
pl: bazylia, Bazylia pospolita, bazylii, bazyliowy, bazyliowe, bazyliowa
pt: manjericão
ro: Busuioc
ru: Базилик душистый, базилик
sc: Frabica
sh: Bosiljak
sk: bazalka, bazalka pravá
sl: Navadna bazilika
so: Reexaan
sr: босиљак, bosiljak
sv: basilika
ta: திருநீற்றுப்பச்சை
te: విభూది తులసి
tl: Balanoy
to: Taʻetaʻe
tr: Fesleğen
tt: Затлы рәйхан
uk: Базилік духмяний
ur: تلسی نازبو
uz: Rayhon
vi: Húng quế
zh: 羅勒

en: Fresh basil
bg: пресен босилек
fr: Basilic frais
hr: svježi bosiljak
it: basilico fresco

en: basil leaf, basil leaves
de: Basilikumblätter
fr: Feuilles de basilic
hr: list bosiljka
it: foglia di basilico
pl: liście bazylii

en: basil sprig
fr: brin de basilic, branche de basilic

en: fresh basil leaf, fresh basil leaves
fr: feuille de basilic frais, feuille fraîche de basilic

en: dried basil
bg: сух босилек
de: getrocknetes Basilikum
es: albahaca seca
fi: kuivattu basilika
fr: basilic séché, basilic déshydraté
hr: sušeni bosiljak
it: basilico essiccato
nl: gedroogde basilicum
pl: bazylia suszona, suszona bazylia

en: basil extract
bg: екстракт от босилек
de: Basilikumextrakt
es: extracto de albahaca
fi: basilikauute
fr: extrait de basilic
hr: ekstrakt bosiljka
it: Estratto di basilico
nl: basilicumextract
pl: ekstrakt z bazylii, wyciąg z bazylii
pt: extrato de manjericão, extracto de manjericão

fr: basilic en poudre
fi: basilikajauhe

en: genoese basil
it: basilico genovese

en: Thai basil
de: Thai Basilikum
fr: basilic thaï, basilic thai
hr: tajlandski bosiljak
it: basilico tailandese
pl: bazylia tajska

en: chervil
bg: керевиз
da: kørvel
de: Kerbel
el: σκαντζίκι
eo: cerfolio
es: perifollo, cerafolio
et: aed, harakputk
fi: kirveli
fr: cerfeuil
ga: costóg
hr: krasuljica
hu: turbolya
it: cerfoglio
la: Anthriscus cerefolium
lv: kārvele
mt: sorfolja
nl: kervel
pl: trybula, trybuli, Trybula ogrodowa
pt: cerefólio
ro: asmățui
sk: trebuľka voňavá
sl: krebuljica
sv: körvel

en: fresh chervil
it: cerfoglio fresco
nl: verse kervel

en: dried chervil
nl: gedroogde kervel